District of Columbia statutes.
31-736

Failure to give notice.

If the mutual company complies substantially and in good faith with the notice requirements of this subchapter, the mutual company’s failure to give any member or members any required notice does not impair the validity of any action taken under this subchapter.

Sept. 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-159, § 7, 43 DCR 3714
1981 Ed., § 35-3726.
See notes to § 35-3721.